Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8464.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 24-8 of the General Laws entitled "Construction and Maintenance of
State Roads" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
24-8-4.3. Traffic control – Use of crash truck - Cameras.
(a) Effective January 1, 2027, all contractors performing work on any project for the Rhode
Island department of transportation (RIDOT) or Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority
(RITBA) on state-owned or maintained roads or bridges, shall have in place a traffic control and
monitoring plan, which shall be filed with RIDOT and/or RITBA as part of any bid or contract
relative to the contract or work being performed. As part of the traffic control and monitoring plan,
a contractor shall have on site a crash truck/attenuator truck as referred to in § 24-8-4.2 which shall
include traffic monitoring cameras. The crash truck/attenuator truck shall be in place and the
camera operational during any time in which construction or maintenance work is being undertaken
on any state highway and/or interstate connector; provided that, for the avoidance of doubt, these
requirements and the provisions of this section do not apply to work performed by public utilities.
(b) The crash truck/attenuator truck shall be equipped with at least one camera facing
oncoming traffic if the work being performed is on a divided highway and, if not a divided highway,
a camera facing in both directions of any roadway on which the work is being performed.
(c) In the event any motor vehicle accident occurs at the work site and any state employee
or construction worker is injured or killed while engaged in the road work, a copy of all videos

generated from the cameras shall be provided to the Rhode Island state police and the department
of attorney general for purposes of identifying the operator of the vehicle, determining the cause of
the accident and shall be used in the course of any investigation and the prosecution of any person
determined to be at fault, whether through negligence, recklessness or deliberate conduct.
(d)(1) Every person/contractor convicted of a first violation of this section shall be subject
to a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500).
(2) Every person/contractor convicted of a second and subsequent violation of this section
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to imprisonment for not more than one year and/or a
fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC006328/SUB A/3
========
LC006328/SUB A/3 - Page 2 of 3